Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.590

Distinguished professorship trust fund program—Continuation of program established under prior law.

A distinguished professorship program established under chapter 343, Laws of 1985 shall continue to operate under RCW 28B.76.555 through 28B.76.585 and the requirements of RCW 28B.76.555 through 28B.76.585 shall apply.

[ 2004 c 275 s 21; 1987 c 8 s 8. Formerly RCW 28B.10.873.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.